California statutes. Financial Code
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this
 division shall not apply to a depository institution, as defined in Section 1420, a person licensed pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) or Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000), a person licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, a person who is subject to the Karnette Rental-Purchase Act (Title 2.96 (commencing with Section 1812.620) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), or a trustee performing acts in connection with a nonjudicial foreclosure pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 2920) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(2) The commissioner may use the authority described in Section 100005 in connection with a violation of Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) or Title 1.6C.5 (commencing
 with Section 1788.50) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code by a person described in paragraph (1).

(c) This division shall not apply to debt collection regulated pursuant to Division 12.5 (commencing with Section 28100) or to the collection of covered commercial debt or covered commercial credit, as those terms are defined in Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 522, Sec. 16.   (SB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Definitions [100002. - 100002.]

100002.

For purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Applicant” means a person, including a natural person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust, estate, cooperative, association, or other entity, who applied for a license pursuant to this division.

(b) “California debtor accounts” means accounts that are owned by consumers who reside in California at the time that the consumer makes a payment on the account.

(c) “Collection agency” means a business entity through which a debt collector or an association of debt collectors engage
 in debt collection.

(d) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(e) “Consumer credit transaction” means a transaction between a natural person and another person in which property, services, or money is acquired on credit by that natural person from the other person primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(f) “Consumer debt” or “consumer credit” means money, property, or their equivalent, due or owing, or alleged to be due or owing, from a natural person by reason of a consumer credit transaction. The term “consumer debt” includes a mortgage debt. The term “consumer debt” includes “charged-off consumer debt” as defined in Section 1788.50 of the Civil Code.

(g) “Creditor” means a person who extends consumer credit to a debtor.

(h) “Debt” means money, property, or their equivalent that is due or owning or alleged to be due or owing from a natural person to another person.

(i) “Debt collection” means any act or practice in connection with the collection of consumer debt.

(j) “Debt collector” means any person who, in the ordinary course of business, regularly, on the person’s own behalf or on behalf of others, engages in debt collection. The term includes any person who composes and sells, or offers to compose and sell, forms, letters and other collection media used or intended to be used for debt collection.
 The term “debt collector” includes “debt buyer” as defined in Section 1788.50 of the Civil Code.

(k) “Debtor” means a natural person from whom a debt collector seeks to collect a consumer debt that is due or owing or alleged to be due or owing from the person.

(l) “Department” means the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(m) “Fund” means the Debt Collection Licensing Fund established pursuant to Section 100006.5.

(n) “Licensee” means a person licensed, conditionally or unconditionally, pursuant to this chapter.

(o) “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry” means a
 system of record, created by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators, for nondepository, financial services licensing or registration in participating state agencies, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, and Guam.

(p) “Person” means a natural person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust, estate, cooperative, association, or other similar entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 198, Sec. 7.   (SB 152)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Licensing [100003. - 100017.]



  ARTICLE 1. Commissioner on Financial Protection and Innovation [100003. - 100006.5.]

100003.

(a) The commissioner shall administer this division and may adopt rules and regulations, and issue orders, consistent with that authority.

(b) Without limitation, the functions, powers, and duties of the commissioner include all of the following:

(1) To issue or to refuse to issue a license as provided in this division.

(2) To allow affiliated companies to be under a
 single license. The commissioner shall adopt regulations specifying what constitutes an affiliated company for these purposes.

(3) To revoke or suspend any license for a violation of this division or a violation of Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) or Title 1.6C.5 (commencing with Section 1788.50) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(4) To keep records of licenses issued under this division.

(5) To receive, consider, investigate, and act upon a complaint made in connection with a licensee.

(6) To prescribe the form of and to receive applications for licenses and reports, books, and records required to be made or retained by a licensee.

(7) To subpoena documents and witnesses, and to compel their attendance and production, to administer oaths, and to require the production of books, papers, or other materials relevant to any inquiry authorized by this division.

(8) To require information with regard to an applicant that the commissioner may deem necessary, with regard for the paramount public interest in ascertaining the experience, background, honesty, truthfulness, integrity, and competency of an applicant for collecting consumer debt, and if an applicant is an entity other than an individual, in ascertaining the honesty, truthfulness, integrity, and competency of officers, directors, or managing members of the corporation, association, or other entity, or the general patters of a partnership.

(9) To enforce by order any provision of this division.

(10) To levy fees, fines, and charges in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of the services performed in administering this division. The fees collected pursuant to this division shall not exceed the costs of administering this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100003.3.

(a) The proceedings for a revocation of a license shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license if, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, the commissioner finds any of the following:

(1) The licensee violated this division or a regulation adopted or an order issued under
 this division.

(2) The licensee does not cooperate with an examination or investigation by the commissioner.

(3) The licensee violates Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) or Title 1.6C.5 (commencing with Section 1788.50) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code. The commissioner may adopt regulations that specify the factors that the commissioner will consider in revoking or suspending a license, including, but not limited to, the harm to the consumer, the frequency of the violation, and the number of prior disciplinary actions taken against the licensee.

(4) The licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of its obligations, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors.

(5) A receiver, liquidator, or conservator has been appointed for a licensee.

(6) Any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time that the licensee applied for the license, would have been grounds for denying the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100004.

(a) Notwithstanding any law the commissioner shall have the authority to conduct investigations and examinations of an applicant or licensee as follows:

(1) For purposes of determining whether an applicant is eligible for a license, or that a licensee is complying with the provisions of this division or any regulation or order of the commissioner, the commissioner may access, receive, and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information, or evidence that relates to debt
 collection, including, but not limited to, any of the following relating to the intent to, or the practice of, collecting consumer debt:

(A) Criminal, civil, and administrative history information.

(B) Personal history and experience information, including, but not limited to, independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency.

(C) Any other documents, information, or evidence that the commissioner deems relevant to the inquiry or investigation regardless of the location, possession, control, or custody of those documents, information, or evidence.

(2) For the purposes of investigating violations or complaints arising under this division,
 the commissioner may direct, subpoena, or order the attendance of, and examine under oath, any person whose testimony may be required about the consumer debt or account of the debtor.

(b) In making any examination or investigation authorized by this section, the commissioner may control access to any documents and records of the licensee or person under examination or investigation. The commissioner may take possession of the documents and records or place a person in exclusive charge of the documents and records in the place where they are usually kept. During the period of control, no person shall remove or attempt to remove any of the documents and records except pursuant to a court order or with the consent of the commissioner. Unless the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe the documents or records of a licensee have
 been, or are at risk of being, altered or destroyed for purposes of concealing a violation of this division, the licensee or owner of the documents and records shall have access to the documents or records as necessary to conduct their ordinary business affairs. 

(c) The commissioner may permit affiliated companies to be subject to a single examination. The department shall list all
 affiliated company names on the license and shall post them on the department’s internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100005.

(a) If, in the opinion of the commissioner, a person who is required to be licensed under this division is engaged in business as a debt collector without a license from the commissioner, or a person or licensee has violated any provision of this division, an order, or a regulation adopted pursuant to this division, or Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) or Title 1.6C.5 (commencing with Section 1788.50) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, the commissioner may do any of the following:

(1) After notice and an opportunity for a hearing, order the person or licensee to desist and to refrain from engaging in the business of further continuing the violation.

(2) After notice and an opportunity for a hearing, order the person or licensee to pay ancillary relief. The ancillary relief may include, but need not be limited to, refunds, restitution, disgorgement, and payment of damages, as appropriate, on behalf of a person injured by the conduct or practice that constitutes the subject matter of the assessment. A person or licensee may dispute an order to pay ancillary relief for an individual violation of Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) or Title 1.6C.5 (commencing with Section 1788.50) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, if the same injured person brought an action for the same violation against the
 same person or licensee in court, the action resulted in a final judgment on the merits, and all damages, penalties, or fees have been paid to the injured person.

(b) If, in the opinion of the commissioner, a depository institution, as defined in Section 1420, a person licensed pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) or Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000), or a person licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code,
 has violated Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) or Title 1.6C.5 (commencing with Section 1788.50) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, the commissioner may take the actions described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a). 

(c) If, within 30 days after an order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) is served, a written request for a hearing is filed and no hearing is held within 30 days thereafter, the order shall be deemed rescinded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100006.

(a) Notwithstanding any law, the commissioner may by rule or order prescribe circumstances under which to accept electronic records or electronic signatures. This section shall not be deemed to require the commissioner to accept electronic records or electronic signatures.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Electronic record” means an initial license application, or material modification of that license application, and any other record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means. “Electronic record” also includes, but is not limited to, all of the following electronic documents:

(A) An application, amendment, supplement, and exhibit, filed for any license, consent, or other authority.

(B) A financial statement, report, or advertising.

(C) A surety bond, rider, or endorsement thereto.

(D) An order, license, consent, or other authority.

(E) A notice of public hearing, accusation, and statement of issues in connection with any application, license, consent, or other authority.

(F) A proposed decision of a hearing officer and a decision of the commissioner.

(G) The transcripts of a hearing and correspondence between a party and the
 commissioner directly relating to the record.

(H) A release, newsletter, interpretive opinion, determination, or specific ruling.

(I) Correspondence between a party and the commissioner directly relating to any document listed in subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive.

(2) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation has continuously implemented methods to accept records filed electronically, and is encouraged to continue to expand its use of electronic filings to the extent feasible, as
 budget, resources, and equipment are made available to accomplish that goal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 165.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100006.3.

(a) The commissioner may require an applicant for a license to make some or all of the filings with the commissioner through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry.

(b) The commissioner may require an application to be made through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry, and may require fees, financial statements, supporting documents, changes of address, and any other information, and amendments or modifications thereto, to be submitted by applicants and licensees through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry.

(c) The commissioner may require licensees to pay annual
 fees through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 198, Sec. 8.   (SB 152)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100006.5.

(a) The Debt Collection Licensing Fund is hereby established within the state treasury.

(b) All licensing fees collected shall be deposited into the Fees Account which is hereby established within the fund.

(c) All fines and penalties collected shall be deposited into the Penalties Account which is hereby established within the fund.

(d) All monies deposited into the fund
 shall be available to the commissioner, upon appropriation by the Legislation, for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Application for Licensure [100007. - 100014.]

100007.

An applicant shall apply for a license by submitting all of the following to the commissioner:

(a) A completed application for a license in a form prescribed by the commissioner and signed under penalty of perjury. An application shall include the location of the applicant’s principal place of business and all branch office locations.

(b) (1) An application fee, of three hundred fifty dollars ($350), and an investigation fee, the amount of which shall be determined by the department, to cover any costs incurred in processing an application, including a fingerprint processing and criminal history record check under Section 100009. The investigation fee, including the amount for the criminal history record check, and the application fee are not refundable if an application is denied or withdrawn.

(2) The fees assessed pursuant to this subdivision shall be billed and collected by the commissioner at the time of initial application.

(c) A sample of the initial letter required pursuant to Section 1692g of Title 15 of the United States Code that the licensee will use in correspondence with California consumers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 77, Sec. 6.   (AB 137)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100008.

(a) The commissioner shall require a background investigation of each applicant by means of a Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history record check of the individuals subject to investigation under Section 100009 and shall require the submission of fingerprints for each individual subject to investigation under Section 100009.

(b) If the applicant is a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust, estate, cooperative, association, or other business organization, the commissioner shall require a Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history record check, including the submission of fingerprints, for each individual described in Section 100009.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System Registry may be used as a channeling agent between the United States Department of Justice and the commissioner for purposes of requesting and distributing information for the background investigations described in this section.

(d) (1) An applicant shall not be denied a license on the basis of a criminal conviction, or on the basis of acts underlying a criminal conviction, if the convicted person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code or has been granted clemency or a pardon by a state or federal executive.

(2) An applicant shall not be denied a license on the basis of a conviction that has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, or 1203.425 of the Penal Code. An applicant who has a conviction that has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, or 1203.41 of the Penal Code shall provide the commissioner with proof of the dismissal if it is not reflected in the applicant’s criminal history record report.

(3) An applicant shall not be denied a license on the basis of an arrest that resulted in a disposition other than a conviction, including an arrest that resulted in an infraction, citation, or juvenile adjudication.

(4) An applicant may be denied a license on the grounds that the applicant knowingly made a false statement of fact that is required
 to be revealed in the application for the license. An applicant shall not be denied a license based solely on an applicant’s failure to disclose a fact that would not have been cause for denial of the license had it been disclosed.

(5) If an applicant is denied a license based solely or in part on conviction history, the applicant shall be notified in writing of all of the following:

(A) The denial or disqualification of licensure.

(B) The procedure for the applicant to challenge the decision or to request reconsideration.

(C) That the applicant has the right to appeal the decision.

(D) The processes to
 request a copy of the applicant’s complete conviction history and to question the accuracy or completeness of the record.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 198, Sec. 10.   (SB 152)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100009.

(a) (1) Upon the filing of an application for a license pursuant to Section 100007 and the payment of the fees, if the applicant is a partnership, the commissioner shall investigate all of the following:

(A) The applicant.

(B) The applicant’s managing partners and supervising partners, as defined in the partnership agreement.

(C) Any individual owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests in the applicant.

(D) Any individual
 responsible for the conduct of the applicant’s debt collection activities or policies in this state.

(2) Upon the filing of an application for a license pursuant to Section 100007 and the payment of the fees, if the applicant is a corporation, trust, limited liability company, or association, including an unincorporated organization, the commissioner shall investigate all of the following:

(A) The applicant.

(B) Any principal officer of the applicant.

(C) The applicant’s board of directors.

(D) Any trustee of the applicant.

(E) Any managing member of the applicant if the applicant is a limited liability company.

(F) Any individual owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding equity securities in the applicant.

(G) Any individual responsible for the conduct of the applicant’s debt collection activities or policies in this state.

(b) Upon the filing of an application for a license pursuant to Section 100007 and the payment of the fees, the commissioner
 shall investigate the individual responsible for the debt collection activity of the licensee at the location described in the application. The investigation may be limited to information that was not included in prior applications filed pursuant to this division.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “principal officers” means a president, chief executive officer, chief operating officer, treasurer, and chief financial officer, as may be applicable, and any other officer with direct decisionmaking responsibility for the applicant’s debt collection activities or policies in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 198, Sec. 11.   (SB 152)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100011.

(a) When the application is complete, including the information from the Department of Justice, and the commissioner determines that the applicant has satisfied the requirements set forth in this division and does not find facts constituting reasons for denial, the commissioner shall issue and deliver a license to the applicant.

(b) If the commissioner determines that the requirements have not been satisfied, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, the commissioner may deny the
 application and shall provide a written explanation for the denial.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100012.

(a) The proceedings for a denial of a license shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) After notice and an opportunity for a hearing the commissioner may deny an application for a license for any of the following reasons:

(1) A false statement of a material fact has been made in the application.

(2) The applicant or any principal officer, director, general partner, managing member, or individual owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant, within the last 10 years has (A) been convicted of, or pleaded nolo contendere to, a crime, other than traffic violations, or (B) committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, if the crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with this division.

(3) The applicant or any principal officer, director, general partner, managing member, or individual owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity
 securities of the applicant, has violated, or is not in material compliance with this division, or an order or rule of the commissioner.

(4) A material requirement for issuance of a license has not been met, provided that a written notice of a material omission shall first be sent to the applicant with an opportunity to correct the omission prior to the applicant’s denial.

(5) The applicant or any principal officer, director, general partner, managing member, or individual owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant, has violated this division or the rules thereunder, or any similar regulatory scheme of this or a foreign jurisdiction.

(6) The
 applicant or any principal officer, director, general partner, managing member, or individual owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant, has been held liable by final judgment in a civil action under Title 1.6C (commencing with Section 1788) or Title 1.6C.5 (commencing with Section 1788.50) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, within the past seven years.

(7) The commissioner, based on its investigation of the applicant, is unable to find that the financial responsibility, criminal records, experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant and its general partners, managing members, principal officers and directors, and individuals owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities
 of the applicant, support a finding that the business will be operated honestly, fairly, efficiently, and in accordance with the requirements of this division. 

(8) The commissioner may adopt regulations specifying the
 factors that the commissioner will consider in denying a license, including, but not limited to, the harm to the consumer, the frequency of prior violations, and the number of prior disciplinary actions taken against the licensee in California or in other states.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100013.

(a) The commissioner may deem an application for a license abandoned if the applicant fails to respond to any request for information required by the commissioner or department during an investigation of the application.

(b) The commissioner shall notify the applicant, in writing, that if the applicant fails to submit responsive information within 60 days from the date the commissioner sent the written request for information, the commissioner may deem the application abandoned.

(c) An application fee paid prior to the date an application is deemed abandoned shall not be refunded. Abandonment of an application pursuant to this subdivision shall not preclude the applicant from submitting a new application and fee for a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 12.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

100014.

A license shall remain effective until the license is either suspended or revoked by the commissioner or surrendered by the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry [100015. - 100017.]

100015.

(a) The commissioner is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this division.

(b) For the purpose of participating in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry, the commissioner is authorized to waive
 or modify, in whole or in part, by rule, regulation, or order, any or all of the requirements of this division and to establish new requirements as reasonably necessary to participate in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry.

(c) The commissioner may use the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from, and distributing information to, the Department of Justice, any other governmental agency, or any other source, as directed by the commissioner.

(d) The commissioner shall establish a process through which applicants and licensees may challenge information entered into the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100016.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 1512 of the SAFE Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 5111(a)), the requirements under any federal law or the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any state court, with respect to that information or material, shall continue to apply
 to the information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry. The information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal law or the Information Practices Act.

(b) Information or material that is subject to a privilege or confidentiality under subdivision (a) shall not be subject to any of the following:

(1) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal government or the state.

(2) Subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry with respect to the information or material, the person to whom the information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of that person, that privilege.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions included in, the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry for access by the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100017.

The commissioner shall report regularly violations of this division, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry, to the extent that the information is a public record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Licensee Duties [100018. - 100022.]

100018.

(a) A licensee shall notify the commissioner, in writing, of any change in the information provided in the application for a license, as applicable, not later than 30 days after the occurrence of the event that results in the information becoming inaccurate or incomplete.

(b) (1) If a licensee seeks to change its place of business to a street address other than that designated in its license, the licensee shall provide written notice to the commissioner at least 10 days prior to the
 change.

(2) A licensee shall not engage in the business of debt collection at a new location in a name other than a name approved by the commissioner.

(3) A licensee that opens a new branch office or changes the location of an existing branch office shall notify the commissioner in writing of the new or changed branch office location within 30 days after the branch office begins business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100019.

A licensee shall do all of the following:

(a) Develop policies and procedures reasonably intended to promote compliance with this division.

(b) File with the commissioner any report required by the commissioner.

(c) Comply with the provisions of this division and any regulation or order of the commissioner.

(d) Submit to
 periodic examination by the commissioner as required by this division and any regulation or order of the commissioner.

(e) Maintain a surety bond in accordance with this section in a minimum amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The bond shall be payable to the commissioner and issued by an insurer authorized to do business in this state. The surety bond, including any and all riders and endorsements executed subsequent to the effective date of the bond, shall be filed with the commissioner within 10 days of execution. The bond shall be used for the recovery of expenses, fines, and fees levied by the commissioner in accordance with this division. The commissioner may require licensees to submit bonds, riders, and endorsements electronically through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry’s electronic
 surety bond function.

(1) When an action is commenced on a licensee’s bond, the commissioner may require the filing of a new bond. Immediately upon recovery of any action on the bond, the licensee shall file a new bond. Failure to file a new bond within 10 days of the recovery on a bond, or within 10 days after notification by the commissioner that a new bond is required, constitutes sufficient grounds for the suspension or revocation of the license. A licensee may provide the commissioner a refundable deposit in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in lieu of the bond while the licensee pursues a new bond.

(2) The commissioner may require a higher bond amount for a licensee based on the number of affiliates under the license and the dollar amount of collecting
 consumer debt by that licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100020.

(a) Each licensee shall pay to the commissioner its pro rata share of all costs and expenses reasonably incurred in the administration of this division, as estimated by the commissioner, for the ensuing year and any deficit actually incurred or anticipated in the administration of the division in the year in which the annual fee is levied. The pro rata share shall be based upon the proportion
 of net proceeds generated by California debtor accounts in the preceding year after the amount levied pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) On or before September 30 in each year, the commissioner shall notify each licensee of the amount of the annual fee schedule that will take effect on January 1. If payment is not made by January 1, the commissioner shall assess and collect a penalty, in addition to the fee, of 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.

(c) In the levying and collection of the annual fees, a licensee shall neither be charged for nor be permitted to pay less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than an aggregate of all reasonable costs to operate this division, with the exception of fees associated
 with investigations and examinations.

(d) If a licensee fails to pay the annual fees on or before January 1, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the license issued to the licensee. If, after an order is made, a request for hearing is filed in writing within 30 days, and a hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During any period when the license is revoked or suspended, a licensee shall not engage in the business of collecting debt in this state pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by order of the commissioner. However, the revocation, suspension, or surrender of a license shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided in this division.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to
 (d), inclusive, the commissioner may by rule require licensees to pay annual fees through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System & Registry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, pursuant to Sec. 100000.5.)
-------------------------------------------

100021.
